Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 1. Declaration of Rights
Statute providing for lump sum compensation payment to surviving dependent parents of deceased employee is not unconstitutional in failing to provide for United States citizens residing abroad, in absence of showing that there are dependent parents residing abroad. Cuthbertson v. Union Pac. Coal Co., 50 Wyo. 441, 62 P.2d 311,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1936).

Jurisdiction of divorce action obtained by publication authorizes court to dispose of homestead

within state without violating this section. Closson v. Closson, 30 Wyo. 1, 215 P. 485,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1923).

Adoption statute constitutional. —

Because the legislature did not provide that paternal grandparent visitation rights survived the adoption of their grandchild by the child's maternal grandparents, such visitation rights were limited and terminable without notice, and therefore did not rise to the magnitude of constitutionally protected liberty interests. The adoption statutes extinguished all legal relationships between the adopted child and his biological family. Hede v. Gilstrap, 2005 WY 24, 107 P.3d 158,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 2005).

Incarcerated defendant in divorce action. —

Where the defendant, incarcerated at the state penitentiary, did not appear in a divorce action and judgment was entered against him, he was denied his day in court. Murray v. Murray, 894 P.2d 607,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 1995).

Failure to give biological father same procedure to establish
paternity as mother constitutional. —

The failure to give the biological father the same procedure to establish paternity or nonpaternity as is given to the mother does not unconstitutionally deprive the father of due process of law nor equal protection of the law by virtue of an impermissible gender-based classification. A v. X, Y, & Z, 641 P.2d 1222,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 307

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 459 U.S. 1021, 103 S. Ct. 388, 74 L. Ed. 2d 518, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 4426 (U.S. 1982).

State not obligated to pay for medical examination in parental
termination hearing. —

Due process requires expenditure of public monies for tests performed by a defense expert where those tests could exclude a defendant as the guilty party. The court, however, does not commit error when it holds that the state does not have to pay for a medical examination where, in a parental-termination hearing, a father is charged with having “sexual intercourse” with his daughter because, even if the examination reveals no rupture or trauma to the hymeneal area — a factor which serves to deny sexual intercourse in the medical sense — from the legal point of view, this physical evidence does not mean that the father has not engaged in sexual intercourse, as sexual intercourse, as defined in law, is accomplished if there is the slightest penetration of the sexual organ of the female by the sexual organ of the male. In re Matter of GP, 679 P.2d 976,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 269

(Wyo. 1984).

Juveniles and adults are not similarly situated. —

Juvenile's argument that his equal protection rights were violated by three-year probation term for crime with a maximum sentence of one year failed because juveniles and adults are not similarly situated; proceedings in juvenile court are equitable as opposed to being criminal. In re Interests of ALJ, 836 P.2d 307,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 1992).

Juvenile probation. —

Due process rights were not violated in a juvenile case because the recommendations of the multi-disciplinary team and the preliminary findings of the juvenile probation officer were included in the trial court's order, which met the statutory purpose of designing individualized dispositions. Moreover, defendant signed off on these conditions, so he had actual knowledge of them.
CT v. State (In re CT), 2006 WY 101, 140 P.3d 643,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. 2006).

Incarcerated defendant entitled to be heard. —

The defendant was denied due process of law when the court ignored a timely motion for a trial continuance based upon the plaintiff's failure to answer a cross-complaint and interrogatories, and proceeded with trial without allowing the incarcerated pro se defendant any opportunity to be heard in opposition prior to subjecting him to significant property rights deprivation. Tageant v. Tageant, 909 P.2d 322,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1996).

Shackling of defendant during trial. —

In a sexual assault case, a court's abuse of discretion in allowing the shackling of defendant during trial was harmless error and did not deny defendant his right to a fair trial where defendant was seated before the jury was brought in, and the shackles could not be seen once the jury was seated. Daniel v. State, 2003 WY 132, 78 P.3d 205,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 2003), cert. denied, 540 U.S. 1205, 124 S. Ct. 1476, 158 L. Ed. 2d 127, 2004 U.S. LEXIS 1455 (U.S. 2004).

In a murder case, defendant was not denied the right to a fair trial where, although he was improperly restrained at trial with leg restraints, the error was harmless. Evidence of defendant's guilt was strong; he pleaded guilty in federal court to similar charges from the incident, and the evidence of guilt was much more than a credibility contest as considerable and independent circumstantial evidence existed supporting his guilt on the charges. Duke v. State, 2004 WY 120, 99 P.3d 928,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 2004), cert. denied, 544 U.S. 1062, 125 S. Ct. 2513, 161 L. Ed. 2d 1113, 2005 U.S. LEXIS 4397 (U.S. 2005).

Declaring minor a delinquent. —

Trial court violated minor's due process rights when it found her in contempt of court and placed her in a school for girls without notifying her that she could be declared to be a delinquent child and placed in the girls' school if she violated the juvenile court's order and the court failed to file a petition in the juvenile court stating the jurisdictional facts as required by §

14-6-212

.TLL v. State (In the Interest of TLL), 899 P.2d 44,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1995).

Unconstitutionality of former workmen's compensation provision
relating to third-person liability not shown beyond reasonable doubt.
—

See Stephenson v. Mitchell, 569 P.2d 95,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 317

(Wyo. 1977).

Property right created in Deputy Sheriff. —

Section

18-3-611

creates a property right in the position of a full-time deputy sheriff by requiring that any termination of employment be for cause and after notice and opportunity for a hearing. In addition to the statutory requirements for notice and opportunity to be heard, there is then a federal constitutional right to due process of law that demands notice of the cause for termination and a hearing on the existence of the cause prior to terminating employment of a full-time deputy sheriff. Lucero v. Mathews, 901 P.2d 1115,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. 1995), reh'g denied,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. Sept. 26, 1995).

Statements by public school principal. —

Public school principal failed to meet his burden of showing that his statements made to the board of education on the career education program and football reserved ticket sales were constitutionally protected or the substantial or motivating factor for his termination. Schmidt v. Fremont County School Dist., 558 F.2d 982, 1977 U.S. App. LEXIS 12285 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1977).

Procedure prescribed by rules of State Bar Disciplinary Code
is constitutionally fair. —

See Mendicino v. Whitchurch, 565 P.2d 460,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 307

(Wyo. 1977).

Failure to appear with counsel requires hearing. —

When the basis for the entry of a default against a corporation is failure to appear with counsel, due process demands at least an informal hearing for presentation of evidence and explanations of the defendant, its counsel, and the opposing party. Lawrence-Allison & Assocs. W. v. Archer, 767 P.2d 989,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1989).

Notation “careless driving” accompanied by reference to ordinance number

informs defendant of the nature of the offense charged with all the specificity needed. Swisse v. Sheridan, 561 P.2d 712,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 239

(Wyo. 1977).

The purpose behind uniform traffic citations is to provide for the speedy and effective disposition of traffic offenses. Within such an informal procedure it is not necessary that the charge be set forth with the same technical precision and formality as required in an information or verified complaint. All that is required is that the accused be informed of the nature of the offense with which he is charged. Such a requirement can be fulfilled by stating the commonly used name of the offense and the statute or ordinance violated. This is sufficient even if it means the accused may be required to inquire of the arresting officer or someone else exactly what the offense includes.
Swisse v. Sheridan, 561 P.2d 712,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 239

(Wyo. 1977).

Cognovit judgment pursuant to lease. —

A cognovit judgment obtained against a lessee-store owner pursuant to a lease provision which authorized any attorney to appear for and confess judgment against the lessee in case of default is not, per se, violative of the lessee's due process rights under the fourteenth amendment of the United States constitution, § 8 of this article and this section. Gifford v. Casper Neon Sign Co., 618 P.2d 547,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1980).

A cognovit judgment is not per se violative of the fourteenth amendment to the constitution of the United States nor art. 1, §§ 6 and 8, Wyo. Const. This is so because a defendant against whom a cognovit judgment is obtained has a remedy under Rule 60(b), W.R.C.P. Gifford v. Casper Neon Sign Co., 639 P.2d 1385,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 298

(Wyo. 1982).

Willful destruction of property. —

In former §

6-10-105

, relating to willful destruction of property, the word “willfully” as used therein is not vague or ambiguous and does include and comprehend an unlawful and evil intent. It therefore cannot be held to be violative of the due process standard of this section as being vague or overbroad. Todd v. State, 566 P.2d 597,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 271

(Wyo. 1977).

Section

6-2-106

(homicide by vehicle) does not deprive the defendant of due process

on the grounds of vagueness.
Armijo v. State, 678 P.2d 864,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 268

(Wyo. 1984).

Section

6-2-106

(aggravated vehicular homicide) is clear enough for the man of ordinary intelligence to understand and, thus, is not unconstitutionally vague. Caton v. State, 709 P.2d 1260,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 621

(Wyo. 1985).

Stalking statute constitutional. —

The specific provision of §

6-2-506

making stalking a felony if committed in violation of any condition of probation, parole, or bail is not unconstitutionally vague and does not violate the defendant's right to equal protection. Garton v. State, 910 P.2d 1348,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1996).

But defendant has right to be heard. —

Defendant who was convicted of stalking based on a protective order issued while defendant was in a locked psychiatric ward was not afforded due process because defendant did not have a meaningful opportunity to be heard. Joyner v. State, 2002 WY 174, 58 P.3d 331,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 201

(Wyo. 2002).

No denial of due process where prosecutor argued elements of
stalking. —

In a stalking case, defendant was not denied his right to a fair trial due to prosecutorial misconduct where the State argued that the jury must consider the facts introduced at trial, and it presented each element of stalking and discussed the evidence produced on each element, including defendant's observed movements on April 4, 2002, and the fact that he continuously lied about his whereabouts and movements that evening. Law v. State, 2004 WY 111, 98 P.3d 181,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 2004).

Sexual assault provision constitutional. —

Section 6-2-303(a)(vi), which makes it criminal for any person in a position of authority over a victim to use that position to cause the victim to submit, is neither unreasonable nor arbitrary, and is within the police power of the state to enact laws for the general welfare of the people. Scadden v. State, 732 P.2d 1036,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 393

(Wyo. 1987).

Defendants'
convictions for violating Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 6-2-315(a)(i) and

6-2-316

after they had consensual sexual intercourse with 15-year-old victims were proper because the statutes were not ambiguous and their meaning and scope could be readily determined by reading the sexual assault statutes in pari materia; the appellate court rejected defendants'
statutory construction contentions, as well as their unconstitutionally vague as applied challenges.
Crain v. State, 2009 WY 128, 218 P.3d 934,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 2009).

Term “solicit” not unconstitutionally vague. —

Court rejected defendant's claim that Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-3-104

(now repealed), the statute under which he was convicted on two alternative theories of soliciting or knowingly encouraging a person under the age of 16 to engage in illicit sexual intrusion, violates due process guaranteed by the U.S. Const. amend. XIV and Art. I, § 6, Wyo. Const.
because it is unconstitutionally vague in that it does not define the term “solicit” or provide fair notice of the prohibited conduct. The term “solicit” is used in numerous Wyoming statutes without being separately defined, and the plain meaning of the term is clear from its dictionary definitions and is routinely used by other jurisdictions. Blakeman v. State, 2004 WY 139, 100 P.3d 1229,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(Wyo. 2004).

No violation of due process to prosecute older, male sex partner.
—

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-3-105

(now repealed) is not so vague as to violate defendant's due process. While it does not specifically define “immodest, immoral, or indecent liberties,” courts have previously held that the statute prohibits sexual intercourse between adult males and minor females, and the previous holdings provided proper notice that the acts defendant took with the victim were illegal. Giles v. State, 2004 WY 101, 96 P.3d 1027,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 2004).

For discussion of Wyoming Sex Offenders Registration Act as constitutional,

see Snyder v. State, 912 P.2d 1127,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1996).

No constitutional right to carry a concealed weapon. —

Where applicant for a gun permit contended he had a fundamental right to own a firearm, guaranteed by the Wyoming Constitution, and that he was, therefore, entitled to a hearing, the Supreme Court of Wyoming held that there was no constitutional right to carry a concealed weapon and, just as one may not drive an automobile without a license, one may not carry a concealed weapon without a permit. King v. Wyo. Div. of Crim. Investigation, 2004 WY 52, 89 P.3d 341,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 2004).

Commitment. —

Due process requires that the nature of an individual's commitment reasonably relate to the purpose for which the individual was committed; in other words, a criminal acquittee may be held as long as he is both mentally ill and dangerous, but no longer. Reiter v. State, 2001 WY 116, 36 P.3d 586,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2001).

Prosecution entitled to notes of social worker hired by defendant.
—

Where defendant asserted an affirmative defense of diminished capacity and battered woman syndrome and hired a licensed social worker to evaluate her, trial court's order requiring production of social worker's notes did not intrude on defendant's attorney-client privilege, and her constitutional right to assistance of counsel was not violated. Trusky v. State, 7 P.3d 5,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 2000).

Prosecutor may point out discrepancies between defendant and
others. —

In a murder case, defendant was not denied the right to a fair trial due to prosecutorial misconduct where the prosecutors, in making certain statements regarding the defendant's capacity for lying, were not attempting to induce the jurors to base their factual determinations on the prosecutors' personal beliefs or opinions, but were merely pointing out that the evidence and the testimony of the prosecution's witnesses contradicted that of defendant. Duke v. State, 2004 WY 120, 99 P.3d 928,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 2004), cert. denied, 544 U.S. 1062, 125 S. Ct. 2513, 161 L. Ed. 2d 1113, 2005 U.S. LEXIS 4397 (U.S. 2005).

Statements to law enforcement officers. —

Prosecution has burden of proving by a preponderance of evidence that a defendant's statement to law enforcement officers was voluntarily made. Edwards v. State, 973 P.2d 41,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1999).

Defendant's statement to law enforcement officers was voluntarily given; there was no evidence that officers or prosecutor intimidated defendant or improperly induced him to sign immunity agreement in exchange for his statement, and prosecutor was justified in later nullifying agreement on grounds that defendant's statement proved to be substantially incorrect. Edwards v. State, 973 P.2d 41,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1999).

There was no error in the trial court's determination that the defendant's statements/confessions were voluntary where (1) the only allegation of coercion arose from the defendant's subjective perception that if he cooperated/confessed, then his children would be returned to him, but the district court resolved that evidentiary dispute in favor of the state, (2) there was no indication that the defendant's mental state was impaired, other than the natural anxiety a defendant might feel where drugs are found in his home and he has been involved in the distribution of those drugs, and (3) the defendant was read his Miranda rights, and he was given the opportunity to speak with a lawyer if he chose. Lara v. State, 2001 WY 53, 25 P.3d 507,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 2001).

Because defendant, who was convicted of indecent liberties with a child, was not in custody when questioned at his residence by the police, no Miranda warnings were required; similarly, staements made by defendant during a custodial interview at the sherfiff's office were made voluntarily, and there was no evidence in the record to support a showing of coercive government action. Gunn v. State, 2003 WY 24, 64 P.3d 716,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 2003).

Statements that defendant made during her interrogation were not voluntary

and, therefore, should have been suppressed, where the police had already identified her as being the principal suspect and, even though she was upset and crying because she was concerned about being charged with a serious crime during her pregnancy, the police continued to interrogate her for two hours. Black v. State, 820 P.2d 969,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 1991).

Statements to police. —

Defendant's statements to police were knowing and voluntary and trial court correctly denied his motions to suppress; although police interview occurred eleven hours after defendant was first advised of his Miranda rights and after surgery to defendant's hand, officer partially re-advised defendant of his rights and defendant acknowledged that he remembered and understood the prior warning, and defendant presented no evidence demonstrating his statements were involuntary. Mitchell v. State, 982 P.2d 717,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 1999).

Defendant's lies about the assailant's identity were inadmissible where defendant had not been read the Miranda warnings. Lewis v. State, 2002 WY 92, 48 P.3d 1063,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 2002).

Where defendant's post-Miranda, voluntary statement confirmed that defendant had provided false statements to the police with the intent to hinder, delay, or obstruct their investigation and render assistance to the assailant, the improper admission of defendant's unwarned statements did not have a substantial and injurious effect or influence on the jury, so the admission of the evidence was harmless error. Lewis v. State, 2002 WY 92, 48 P.3d 1063,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 2002).

Where an officer approached defendant with a drawn gun, defendant was escorted across the street and questioned, and, after being read Miranda rights, defendant confessed involvement in possession of marijuana, the confession was voluntary. Eckenrod v. State, 2003 WY 51, 67 P.3d 635,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 2003).

Jury's consideration of defendant's statement to detective.
—

In a sexual assault case, defendant was not denied the right to a fair trial from prosecutorial misconduct where, given the dispute regarding what defendant had actually said in his statement to a detective regarding his being sexually abused as a child, the trial court did not abuse its discretion in permitting the jury to have the entire statement to consider. The State pointed out that although defendant could have requested a limiting instruction directing the jury to restrict its consideration of the evidence to the question of whether the statement actually constituted a denial that he touched the victim inappropriately, the record did not show that he did so. Lopez v. State, 2004 WY 103, 98 P.3d 143,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 2004).

Defendant's voluntary statements not basis for suppression.
—

In defendant's second degree murder case, defendant's constitutional rights were not violated because the trial court refused to suppress his statements to police where: (1) defendant's statements to police, when he was asked to go to the police station and make a statement, were voluntary as was his waiver of Miranda rights that occurred about five minutes after police began his interview, and (2) inquiry ceased when defendant asked about obtaining a lawyer and specified one by name. Lopez v. State, 2004 WY 28, 86 P.3d 851,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 2004).

A motion to suppress a confession was properly denied in a case involving sexual assault because it was voluntarily given; defendant was not promised probation, and defendant's nervousness and learning disability were not relevant since very simple “yes” or “no” questions were asked, and the process was thoroughly explained. Wilkins v. State, 2005 WY 2, 104 P.3d 85,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 2005).

Precharging delay not unconstitutional. —

Although excessive precharging delay may violate a defendant's right to due process under this section, where the defendant in a prosecution for delivery of a controlled substance failed to prove that a 25 month delay was done for an improper tactical advantage, and where whatever resulting prejudice was attributed to his own behavior, the defendant's due process rights were not violated. Fortner v. State, 843 P.2d 1139,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1992).

Intentionally delaying filing charges, resulting in substantial
prejudice, unconstitutional. —

A defendant is denied due process where the prosecutor delays filing charges to gain a tactical advantage, and where substantial prejudice results from the delay. An “implication” that an intentional delay existed is not enough; some evidence must be in the record to support the charge. Also, an argument by the defendant that she “suffered greatly” from a delay because of the death of a witness is not enough; the defendant must demonstrate why her defense was impaired. Black v. State, 820 P.2d 969,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 1991).

Due process right to a speedy appeal. —

In defendant's sexual assault case, the almost 31-month delay in preparing the transcript did not deny defendant his right to a speedy appeal in violation of his right to due process where he did not establish any basis for reversal of his conviction or reduction of his two consecutive life sentences prison term, he did not establish that he suffered anxiety or concern beyond that normally accompanying a pending appeal, and he suffered no prejudice. Daniel v. State, 2003 WY 132, 78 P.3d 205,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 2003), cert. denied, 540 U.S. 1205, 124 S. Ct. 1476, 158 L. Ed. 2d 127, 2004 U.S. LEXIS 1455 (U.S. 2004).

Accused does not need notice and opportunity to be heard before grand jury

in order to protect his constitutional right to due process. Hennigan v. State, 746 P.2d 360,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 536

(Wyo. 1987).

Presumed that jury followed instructions, observed oath. —

It must be presumed that a grand jury followed the court's instructions as to its powers, duties and obligations and that each grand juror fully lived up to and observed his solemn oath, presumably administered in accordance with §

7-5-201

.Hennigan v. State, 746 P.2d 360,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 536

(Wyo. 1987).

And rubber stamping not inferred. —

The number of indictments (61) and the individual counts (327) found in a relatively short period of time (3 days) by the grand jury did not support an inference of rubber stamping. The cases were not complex, and the grand jury might have relied upon the same evidence in addressing cases involving several defendants. Hennigan v. State, 746 P.2d 360,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 536

(Wyo. 1987).

Indictment encompassing elements of offenses deemed adequate.
—

The several counts in the indictment encompassed the appropriate elements for the offenses charged, and, whatever instruction may have been given to the grand jury, it was apparent that its members did understand the elements of these offenses. Hennigan v. State, 746 P.2d 360,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 536

(Wyo. 1987).

Hearsay is admissible in grand jury proceedings without limitation,

and the determination of probable cause may rest exclusively on such evidence. Hennigan v. State, 746 P.2d 360,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 536

(Wyo. 1987).

Grand jury testimony need not be recorded

in the absence of a procedural rule or statute which requires recording, and the failure to do so does not violate due process. Rule 18, W.R. Cr. P., which permits the inspection and copying of the transcript of grand jury testimony of the defendant or the testimony of a witness after he has testified, if the testimony was recorded, satisfies any due process requirements. Hennigan v. State, 746 P.2d 360,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 536

(Wyo. 1987).

Absent bad faith or prejudice, state may file charges years
after events occur. —

A physician charged with inflicting sexual intrusions during pelvic examinations that occurred from 20 months to 17 years earlier was not denied due process or a fair trial as a matter of law; once the state became aware of the potential crimes, it proceeded diligently to investigate and file charges, and there was no indication of bad faith or evidence of specific prejudice. Story v. State, 721 P.2d 1020,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 577

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 479 U.S. 962, 107 S. Ct. 459, 93 L. Ed. 2d 405, 1986 U.S. LEXIS 4771 (U.S. 1986).

Plea to charge, quoting from statute, constitutional. —

A denial of due process did not occur because the defendant was forced to plead to grand jury charges with the only available information being the date and the quotation from the statute he allegedly violated, where he chose not to file a motion for a bill of particulars. Hennigan v. State, 746 P.2d 360,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 536

(Wyo. 1987).

Plea entered without understanding of finality, in reliance
on undisclosed promises, unconstitutional. —

Where defendant pled guilty to all charges against him and requested the death penalty, his pleas were entered without an understanding of their finality, in reliance on undisclosed promises by his counsel, and were, therefore, not knowing and voluntary and were obtained in violation of due process. Osborn v. Schillinger, 639 F. Supp. 610, 1986 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 23167 (D. Wyo. 1986), aff'd, 861 F.2d 612, 1988 U.S. App. LEXIS 14834 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1988).

Statutory presumptions in criminal proceedings. —

The legislature may enact statutory presumptions in criminal proceedings, but the presumption cannot be made a conclusive one, and insofar as its application by way of instruction would make it in any manner conclusive, it is constitutionally impermissible as violative of due process. O'Neal v. State, 498 P.2d 1232,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 260

(Wyo. 1972).

Warrantless arrests. —

Section

7-2-103

, relating to arrests without warrant, is an appropriate expression of the state and federal constitutional guarantee of every citizen's right to due process of law. Rodarte v. Riverton, 552 P.2d 1245,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 208

(Wyo. 1976).

Holding of preliminary hearing or examination by nonlawyer justice of the peace in felony matter

does not constitute a denial of due process. Thomas v. Justice Court of Washakie County, 538 P.2d 42,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1975).

Defendant's due process rights not denied by prosecutor's questions
during voir dire. —

In defendant's indecent liberties case, defendant was not denied a fair trial by the prosecutor's questions during voir dire where, although the trial court might have been more aggressive in managing the voir dire process, it did allow considerable latitude to both sides. The limitations placed on voir dire by the Wyoming Rules of Criminal Procedure were flexible, and purposely so, so as to allow the trial court discretion in that important process. Person v. State, 2004 WY 149, 100 P.3d 1270,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 190

(Wyo. 2004).

Open voir dire in capital murder case not abuse of discretion.
—

The trial court did not abuse its discretion in a capital murder case by requiring an open voir dire with the entire venire panel present. Such an open voir dire, rather than a sequestered examination, did not create a “presumption of guilt” in the minds of the potential jury members, and thus did not deny the constitutional right of a fair and impartial jury. Engberg v. State, 686 P.2d 541,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 301

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 469 U.S. 1077, 105 S. Ct. 577, 83 L. Ed. 2d 516, 1984 U.S. LEXIS 4708 (U.S. 1984).

No constitutional violation for state to remove death-inhibited
jurors through peremptory challenge. —

The defendant's constitutional right to a fair and impartial jury was not violated by the state using its peremptory challenge to remove death-inhibited jurors from the jury panel in a capital murder case. Engberg v. State, 686 P.2d 541,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 301

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 469 U.S. 1077, 105 S. Ct. 577, 83 L. Ed. 2d 516, 1984 U.S. LEXIS 4708 (U.S. 1984).

Jurors willing to impose death penalty not unreliable where
protective instructions given. —

The jurors ultimately selected to sit on the defendant's case did not become prosecution prone, prejudiced, unrepresentative or unreliable because of a willingness to impose the death penalty, if justified, where adequate protective instructions were given. State ex rel. Hopkinson v. District Court, 696 P.2d 54,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 455

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 474 U.S. 865, 106 S. Ct. 187, 88 L. Ed. 2d 155, 1985 U.S. LEXIS 4988 (U.S. 1985).

Bifurcated trial procedure for adjudication of guilt and insanity

under § 7-11-305(a) as that subsection existed prior to its 1978 amendment was violative of a criminal defendant's right to due process. Sanchez v. State, 567 P.2d 270,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 309

(Wyo. 1977).

Reasonable men must necessarily guess at the meaning of § 7-11-305(a) as it existed prior to its 1978 amendment. Sanchez v. State, 567 P.2d 270,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 309

(Wyo. 1977).

The statutory procedure of § 7-11-305(a) as it existed prior to its 1978 amendment failed to provide sufficient guidance as to the type of evidence which is admissible during the first procedural phase. Sanchez v. State, 567 P.2d 270,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 309

(Wyo. 1977).

Section 7-11-305(a) as it existed prior to its 1978 amendment failed to satisfy due process requirements with respect to specific intent crimes, such as the former crime of alleged attempt to commit rape, as well as to general-intent crimes, such as the former crime of rape. Sanchez v. State, 567 P.2d 270,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 309

(Wyo. 1977).

Section 7-11-305(a) as it existed prior to the 1978 amendment, as applied in this case, violated appellant's right to due process of law. Sanchez v. State, 567 P.2d 270,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 309

(Wyo. 1977).

For detailed discussion of uncertainty of § 7-11-305(a) as it existed prior to its 1978 amendment, see Sanchez v. State, 567 P.2d 270,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 309

(Wyo. 1977).

The decision in Sanchez v. State, 567 P.2d 270,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 309

(Wyo. 1977), which held that § 7-11-305(a) as it existed prior to its 1978 amendment was unconstitutional because it inhibited the truth-finding function and thereby violates the defendant's right to the fair trial which due process of law requires, must be applied retroactively to all cases not finally decided and in which the bifurcated procedure provided by § 7-11-305(a) was employed. Flores v. State, 572 P.2d 746,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 287

(Wyo. 1977).

Possession of stolen property may imply guilt. —

An instruction that the jury may infer guilty knowledge from the unexplained possession of recently stolen property did not transgress constitutional standards. Harley v. State, 737 P.2d 750,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 452

(Wyo. 1987).

Prosecutorial Misconduct. —

Defendant's conviction was reversed because (1) the prosecution pervasively used improper “was she lying” questions to undermine defendant's credibility when that was the central issue, (2) the prosecution did not have a strong case, (3) efforts to cure the prosecution's error were ineffective, and (3) defendant did not invite the error, and counsel timely objected. McGinn v. State, 2015 WY 140, 361 P.3d 295,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 2015).

Suppression by prosecution of evidence favorable to accused upon request

violates due process where the evidence is material either to guilt or to punishment, irrespective of the good faith or bad faith of the prosecution. Jones v. State, 568 P.2d 837,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 279

(Wyo. 1977).

No Brady violation. —

In defendant's vehicular homicide case, the State did not commit a Brady violation where defendant presented no evidence that the prosecution failed to preserve the vehicle, and he did not contend that it was lost, destroyed, or contaminated by the prosecution. Defendant presented no evidence that the minivan's condition prevented him, or his expert, from examining, photographing, or testing the scrape marks at issue, and he did not show the exculpatory value of the evidence. Whitney v. State, 2004 WY 118, 99 P.3d 457,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 2004), cert. denied, 544 U.S. 1001, 125 S. Ct. 1931, 161 L. Ed. 2d 775, 2005 U.S. LEXIS 3570 (U.S. 2005).

In defendant's assault case, there was no Brady due process violation where the State produced an audio tape on the second day of trial and the vehicle on the last day of trial, and defense counsel did not seek a continuance, but instead chose to proceed with the trial and do what he could with the newly disclosed evidence. Thomas v. State, 2006 WY 34, 131 P.3d 348,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 2006).

Because defendant had knowledge of information that an accomplice would have provided testified about in order to impeach a witness, there was no Brady violation by the state's failure to provide defendant with information regarding the accomplice's knowledge; in addition, the evidence was not material because defendant had already vigorously assaulted the witness that the accomplice's testimony would have discredited.
Hicks v. State, 2008 WY 83, 187 P.3d 877,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 2008).

Three-pronged test that must be applied in nondisclosure cases

to determine whether a violation of due process has occurred includes: (a) suppression of evidence by the prosecution after a request by the defense; (b) the evidence's favorable character for the defense; and (c) the materiality of the evidence. Jones v. State, 568 P.2d 837,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 279

(Wyo. 1977).

If omitted evidence creates reasonable doubt that did not otherwise exist, constitutional error has been committed,

but if there is no reasonable doubt about guilt, whether or not the additional evidence is considered, there is no justification for a new trial. Hopkinson v. State, 679 P.2d 1008,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 273

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 469 U.S. 873, 105 S. Ct. 228, 83 L. Ed. 2d 157, 1984 U.S. LEXIS 360 (U.S. 1984).

Granting summary judgment prior to discovery was error. —

In negligence case, a court erred by granting defendants' motion for summary judgment because it scheduled the hearing before the deadline for discovery had passed, and therefore plaintiffs were deprived of due process. All of the proposed discovery materials clearly had a bearing on whether there were genuine issues of material fact and needed to be examined by plaintiffs' expert in order to rebut defendants' assertions with respect to spoliation of evidence. Abraham v. Great Western Energy, LLC, 2004 WY 145, 101 P.3d 446,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 2004).

Probation officer's perjury unconstitutional. —

The trial court properly refused a probation officer's dismissal motion of claims against him on the basis of qualified immunity because a reasonable probation officer would have known that the perjury of the sort he allegedly committed, as proscribed by § 6-5-301(a), implicated his probationer's right to substantive due process under this section and the United States constitution. Park County v. Cooney, 845 P.2d 346,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 1992), cert. denied, White v. Cooney, 510 U.S. 813, 114 S. Ct. 60, 126 L. Ed. 2d 30, 1993 U.S. LEXIS 4946 (U.S. 1993).

Probation revocation. —

Defendant's due process rights were not violated in a probation revocation proceeding under Wyo. R. Crim. P. 39 because a district court was allowed to consider a termination report and an investigation report as hearsay evidence in the dispositional stage since the Wyoming Rules of Evidence were suspended during that stage; moreover, the district court did not find defendant's denial of involvement in a robbery scheme to be credible.
Sinning v. State, 2007 WY 193, 172 P.3d 388,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 209

(Wyo. 2007).

Failure of state to obtain medical report of sexual assault victim for trial

does not rise to the level of a due process violation. Sanchez v. State, 751 P.2d 1300,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1988), overruled in part, Bean v. State, 2016 WY 48, 373 P.3d 372,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 2016).

Prosecution's intrusion into attorney-client relationship.
—

On appeal the court rejected defendant's claim that his right to effectively defend and participate in his defense was denied where a deputy sat during trial in a chair along a wall, halfway between defendant's table and the prosecution's table, as far as practicable from defendant; there was no evidence that the deputy heard anything said at defendant's table, the deputy had been instructed never to repeat anything he heard at defendant's table, there was no allegation of prejudice from the use of any information obtained by the deputy from overhearing conversation at defendant's table, and defendant did not state what conversation he would have had if the deputy had not been seated in nearby. Urbigkit v. State, 2003 WY 57, 67 P.3d 1207,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2003).

For application of prosecutorial disclosure rule

to three distinct categories of cases, involving: (a) prosecutorial tolerance of perjured testimony; (b) prosecutorial suppression after specific request by defense for exculpatory evidence; and (c) no request, or only general one, by defense for exculpatory evidence, see Jones v. State, 568 P.2d 837,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 279

(Wyo. 1977).

Witnesses' identifications in prosecution for first-degree
murder. —

In a prosecution for first-degree murder, defendant's constitutional rights were not denied where certain of the witnesses' identifications were only that the deceased had been in a bar on a certain date and where the identifications of the defendant resulted from the witnesses' own surmises. Smith v. State, 574 P.2d 1227,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 269

(Wyo. 1978).
